California, session 20252026, AB772.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 234.41 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 234.4, to read:234.41. (a) (1) On or before June 30, 2026, the department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall develop, post on its internet website, and distribute to each local educational agency, a model policy on how to address reported acts of cyberbullying occurring outside of school hours, provided that, when engaged in outside of the campus, the act is sufficiently severe or pervasive to have the actual and reasonably expected effect of creating an intimidating or hostile educational environment. The model policy shall clarify that local educational agencies are authorized, but not required, to address those acts. This section does not impose liability on a local educational agency for failing to address those acts.(2) In developing the model policy required pursuant to paragraph (1), the department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, may use existing resources or frameworks, including, but not limited to, the Multi-Tiered System of Supports, which includes restorative justice practices, trauma-informed practices, social and emotional learning, and schoolwide positive behavior interventions and support, to be used to help pupils gain critical social and emotional skills, receive support to help transform trauma-related responses, understand the impact of their actions, and develop meaningful methods for repairing harm to the school community.(3) In developing the model policy required pursuant to paragraph (1), the department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall consider establishing guidance on the factors necessary to determine what constitutes an intimidating or hostile educational environment, as well as the factors that demonstrate severity and pervasiveness.(b) The model policy developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be appropriate for local educational agencies that serve pupils enrolled in any of grades 4 to 12, inclusive.(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, each local educational agency shall adopt a policy, or modify its existing procedures adopted pursuant to Section 234.4, on how to address reported acts of cyberbullying occurring outside of school hours, provided that, when engaged in outside of the campus, the act is sufficiently severe or pervasive to have the actual and reasonably expected effect of creating an intimidating or hostile educational environment. The adopted policy may be the model policy developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) or a locally adopted policy with input from stakeholders.(2) Each local educational agency shall post a copy of the adopted policy on its internet website and the internet website of each of its schoolsites.(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.